Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.200

Definitions.

Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and phrases as hereinafter used in RCW 43.06.010, and 43.06.200 through 43.06.270 each as now or hereafter amended shall have the following meaning:

"State of emergency" means an emergency proclaimed as such by the governor pursuant to RCW 43.06.010 as now or hereafter amended.

"Governor" means the governor of this state or, in case of his or her removal, death, resignation or inability to discharge the powers and duties of his or her office, then the person who may exercise the powers of governor pursuant to the Constitution and laws of this state relating to succession in office.

"Criminal offense" means any prohibited act for which any criminal penalty is imposed by law and includes any misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or felony.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5022; 1977 ex.s. c 328 s 11; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 108 s 26; 1969 ex.s. c 186 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 328: See note following RCW 43.21G.010.

Severability—Effective date—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 108: See notes following RCW 43.21F.010.

Provisions cumulative—1969 ex.s. c 186: "The provisions of this act shall be cumulative to and shall not operate to repeal any other laws, or local ordinances, except those specifically mentioned in this act." [ 1969 ex.s. c 186 s 10.]

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 186: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1969 ex.s. c 186 s 11.]

Energy supply emergencies: Chapter 43.21G RCW.